Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.900

Authority to transfer real property.

Cities are authorized to transfer real property pursuant to RCW 43.83.400 and 43.83.410.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 27; 2006 c 35 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 35: See note following RCW 43.83.400.